Virginia statutes. Title 45.2. Mines, Minerals, and Energy.
Article 6. Mine Explosions; Mine Fires; Accidents.

§ 45.2-1144.
Reports of explosions and mine fires; procedure.

If an explosion or mine fire occurs in a mine, the operator shall notify the Department by the quickest available means. Any independent contractor shall notify the licensed operator of such incident. All facilities of the mine shall be made available for rescue and recovery operations and firefighting.

No work other than rescue and recovery work and firefighting shall be attempted or started until and unless it is authorized by the Department.

If an explosion occurs in an underground mine, the fan shall not be reversed except by authority of the officials in charge of rescue and recovery work, and then only after a study of the effect of reversing the fan on persons who might have survived the explosion and are still underground.

The Department shall make available all the facilities at its disposal in effecting rescue and recovery work. The Director shall act as consultant, or take personal charge, where in his opinion the circumstances of any mine explosion, fire, or other accident warrant.

The orders of the officials in charge of rescue and recovery work shall be respected and obeyed by all persons engaged in rescue and recovery work.

The Director shall maintain an up-to-date rescue and recovery plan for prompt and adequate employment at any mineral mine in the Commonwealth. All employees of the Department shall be kept fully informed and trained in their respective duties in executing rescue and recovery plans. The Department’s plans shall be published annually and furnished to all licensed operators of mineral mines. Changes in the plan shall be published promptly when made and furnished to all licensed operators of mines.

History.

1997, c. 390, § 45.1-161.292:50; 1998, c. 695; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-1145.
Operators’ reports of accidents; investigations; reports by Department.

Each operator shall report promptly to the Department the occurrence at any mine of any accident involving serious personal injury or death to any person, whether employed in the mine or not. The scene of the accident shall not be disturbed pending an investigation, except to prevent the suspension of use of a slope, entry, or facility vital to the operation of a section or a mine. In any case in which reasonable doubt exists as to whether to leave the scene unchanged, the operator shall secure prior approval from the Department before any change is made.

The Director shall go personally or dispatch one or more mine inspectors to the scene of such a mineral mine accident, investigate causes, and issue any orders needed to ensure the safety of other persons.

Representatives of the operator shall render any assistance needed and act in a consulting capacity in the investigation. An employee, if so designated by the employees of the mine, shall be notified, and as many as three employees if so designated as representatives of the employees may be present at the investigation in a consulting capacity.

The Department shall render a complete report of circumstances and causes of each accident investigated and make recommendations for the prevention of similar accidents. The Department shall furnish one copy of the report to the licensed operator, one copy to any other operator whose employees were exposed to hazards as a result of the accident, and one copy to the employee representative if he has been present at the investigation. The Director shall maintain a complete file of all accident reports for mineral mines. Further publicity may be ordered by the Director in an effort to prevent mine accidents.

History.

1997, c. 390, § 45.1-161.292:51; 1998, c. 695; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-1146.
Reports of other accidents and injuries.

Each miner employed at a mine shall promptly notify his supervisor of any injury received during the course of his employment.

Each operator shall keep on file a report of each accident including any accident that does not result in a lost-time injury. Copies of such report shall be given to the injured person or his designated representative to enable him to review the accident report and verify its accuracy prior to the filing of such report for the review of state or federal mine inspectors.

History.

1997, c. 390, § 45.1-161.292:52; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-1147.
Duties of mine inspectors.

Each mine inspector shall:

Report to his supervisor immediately, and by the quickest available means, any mine fire, mine explosion, or accident involving serious personal injury or death;

Proceed immediately to the scene of any accident at any mine under his jurisdiction that results in loss of life or serious personal injury, and to the scene of any mine fire or explosion regardless of whether there is loss of life or personal injury. He shall make any investigation and suggestions and render any assistance he deems necessary for the future safety of the employees, and he shall make a complete report to his supervisor as soon as practicable. He shall have the power to compel the attendance of witnesses and administer oaths or affirmations; and

Take charge of mine rescue and recovery operations whenever a mine fire, mine explosion, or other serious accident occurs and supervise the reopening of any mine or section thereof that has been sealed or abandoned on account of fire or any other cause.

History.

1997, c. 390, § 45.1-161.292:53; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.